Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.020

Director—Salary—Powers and duties—Examiners, assistants, personnel.

The director of financial institutions shall be appointed by the governor and shall exercise all powers and perform all of the duties and functions transferred under RCW 43.320.011, and such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. The director may deputize, appoint, and employ examiners and other such assistants and personnel as may be necessary to carry on the work of the department. The director of financial institutions shall receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor.

[ 1993 c 472 s 3.]